Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 6B Quality Assessment Fees on Care Management Organizations

31-8-170.
Legislative authority.

This article is passed pursuant to the authority of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(i) of the Constitution.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-170

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 505, § 1/HB 392.

31-8-171.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Care management organization” means an entity granted a certificate of authority under Chapter 21 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated and which meets the definition found in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396b(w)(7)(A)(viii) as it now exists or as it may be amended in the future.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health created by Chapter 2 of this title.

“Gross direct premium” shall have the meaning that the term has in Chapter 8 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated.

“Quality assessment fee” means the fee imposed pursuant to this article for the privilege of operating a care management organization.

“Segregated account” means an account for the dedication and deposit of provider fees which is established within the Indigent Care Trust Fund created pursuant to Code Section 31-8-152.

“Trust fund” means the Indigent Care Trust Fund created pursuant to Code Section 31-8-152.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-171

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 505, § 1/HB 392; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-8/HB 228.

31-8-172.
Segregated account for the deposit of fees.

There is established within the trust fund a segregated account for revenues raised through the imposition of the quality assessment fee. All revenues raised through such fees shall be credited to the segregated account within the trust fund and shall be invested in the same manner as authorized for investing other moneys in the state treasury. Contributions and transfers to the trust fund pursuant to Code Sections 31-8-153 and 31-8-153.1 shall not be deposited into the segregated account.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-172

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 505, § 1/HB 392.

31-8-173.
Assessment, calculation, and payment of fees.

Each care management organization shall be assessed a quality assessment fee, in an amount to be determined by the department based on anticipated revenue estimates included in the state budget report, with respect to its gross direct premiums. The quality assessment fee shall be assessed uniformly upon all care management organizations. The aggregate quality assessment fees imposed under this article shall not exceed the maximum amount that may be assessed pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Section 433.68(f)(3)(i).

The quality assessment fee shall be paid monthly by each care management organization to the department. A care management organization shall calculate and report its gross direct premiums upon a form prepared by the department and submit therewith payment of the quality assessment fee no later than the tenth day of each calendar month, or in the discretion of the department and upon agreement of the care management organization, said amount may be calculated and withheld by the department from the current month’s premium payment. Unless the department withholds the fee from the premium payment, the initial quality assessment fee report shall be filed and the initial payment of the quality assessment fee shall be submitted no later than the tenth day of the first month in which premiums are paid to the care management organizations for medical assistance to recipients. Unless the department withholds the fee from the premium payment, a care management organization shall calculate and report the initial quality assessment fee using information about its gross direct premiums for the first month in which premiums are paid to the care management organizations for medical assistance to recipients.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-173

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 505, § 1/HB 392; Ga. L. 2006, p. 204, § 2/HB 1308.

31-8-174.
Collection and disposition of fees; authority of department to inspect records of care management organizations; overpayment or underpayment; penalty for failure to pay fee.

The department shall collect the quality assessment fees imposed pursuant to Code Section 31-8-173. All revenues raised pursuant to this article shall be deposited into the segregated account. Such funds shall be dedicated and used for the sole purpose of obtaining federal financial participation for medical assistance payments to one or more providers pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 or for purposes as authorized for expenditures from the trust fund.

The department shall prepare and distribute a form upon which a care management organization shall calculate and report to the department the quality assessment fee.

Each care management organization shall keep and preserve for a period of five years such books and records as may be necessary to determine the amount for which it is liable under this article. The department shall have the authority to inspect and copy the records of a care management organization for purposes of auditing the calculation of the quality assessment fee. All information obtained by the department pursuant to this article shall be confidential and shall not constitute a public record; provided, however, that information otherwise available to the public shall not become confidential solely because it has been obtained by the department.

In the event that the department determines that a care management organization has underpaid or overpaid the quality assessment fee, the department shall notify the care management organization of the balance of the quality assessment fee or refund that is due. Such payment or refund shall be due within 30 days of the department’s notice.

Any care management organization that fails to pay the quality assessment fee pursuant to this article within the time required by this article shall pay, in addition to the outstanding quality assessment fee, a 6 percent penalty for each month or fraction thereof that the payment is overdue. If a quality assessment fee has not been received by the department by the last day of the month, the department shall withhold an amount equal to the quality assessment fee and penalty owed from any medical assistance or other payment due such care management organization under the Medicaid program. The quality assessment fee levied by this article shall constitute a debt due the state and may be collected by civil action and the filing of tax liens in addition to such methods provided for in this article. Any penalty that accrues pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the segregated account.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-174

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 505, § 1/HB 392.

31-8-175.
Appropriation of revenues to the department.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the General Assembly is authorized to appropriate as state funds to the department for use in any fiscal year all revenues dedicated and deposited into the segregated account. Such appropriations shall be made for the sole purpose of obtaining federal financial participation in the provision of health care services pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 or for purposes as authorized for expenditures from the trust fund. Any appropriation from the segregated account for any purpose other than medical assistance payments shall be void.

Revenues appropriated to the department pursuant to this Code section shall be used to match federal funds that are available for the purpose for which such trust funds have been appropriated.

Appropriations from the segregated account to the department shall not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-175

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 505, § 1/HB 392.

31-8-176.
Annual report by the department.

The department shall report annually to the General Assembly on its use of revenues deposited into the segregated account and appropriated to the department pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-176

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 505, § 1/HB 392.

31-8-177.
Applicability of the Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977.

Except where inconsistent with this article, the provisions of Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49, the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977,” shall apply to the department in carrying out the purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-177

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 505, § 1/HB 392.